California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(3) References to a “writ” shall be deemed references to a writ of attachment.

(4) References to a “notice of levy” shall be deemed references to a notice of attachment.

(d) If the defendant has not appeared in the action and legal process is required to be personally served on the defendant under this title, service shall be made in the same manner as a summons is served under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5.

(e) Except for service of a subpoena or other process to require the attendance of the defendant or service of a paper to bring the defendant into contempt, if the defendant has an attorney of record in the action, service shall be made on the attorney rather than on the defendant.

(f) Proof of service under this
 title is governed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 684.210) of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

482.080.

(a) If a writ of attachment is issued, the court may also issue an order directing the defendant to transfer to the levying officer either or both of the following:

(1) Possession of the property to be attached if the property is sought to be attached by taking it into custody.

(2) Possession of documentary evidence of title to property of or a debt owed to the defendant that is sought to be attached. An order pursuant to this paragraph may be served when the property or debt is levied upon or
 thereafter.

(b) The order shall be personally served on the defendant and shall contain a notice to the defendant that failure to comply with the order may subject the defendant to arrest and punishment for contempt of court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 25.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

482.090.

(a) Several writs in the same form may be issued simultaneously or from time to time upon the same undertaking, whether or not any writ previously issued has been returned.

(b) After the return of the writ of attachment, or upon the filing by the plaintiff of an affidavit setting forth the loss of the writ of attachment, the clerk, upon demand of the plaintiff at any time before judgment, may issue an alias writ which shall be in the same form as the original without requirement of a new undertaking.

(c) The date of
 issuance of a writ of attachment shall be deemed to be the date the writ is first issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

482.100.

(a) The defendant may claim an exemption provided in Section 487.020 for property levied upon pursuant to a writ issued under this title if the right to the exemption is the result of a change in circumstances occurring after (1) the denial of a claim of exemption for the property earlier in the action or (2) the expiration of the time for claiming the exemption earlier in the action.

(b) A claim of exemption under this section shall follow the procedure provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4
 of Division 2 of Title 9 except that, subject to subdivision (a), the defendant may claim the exemption at any time. For this purpose, references in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 to the “judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the defendant, and references to the “judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.

(c) The exemption provided by subdivision (b) of Section 487.020 may be claimed at the defendant’s option either pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section or by following the procedure provided in this subdivision. The claim shall be made by filing with the court and serving on the plaintiff a notice of motion. Service on the plaintiff shall be made not less than three days prior to the date set for the hearing. The hearing shall be held not more than five days after the filing of the notice of motion unless, for good cause shown, the court orders otherwise. The
 notice of motion shall state the relief requested and shall be accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised. At the hearing on the motion, the defendant has the burden of showing that the property is exempt pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 487.020. Upon this showing and the showing required by subdivision (a), the court shall order the release of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 26.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

482.110.

(a) The plaintiff’s application for a right to attach order and a writ of attachment pursuant to this title may include an estimate of the costs and allowable attorney’s fees.

(b) In the discretion of the court, the amount to be secured by the attachment may include an estimated amount for costs and allowable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------

482.120.

If the court determines at the hearing on issuance of a writ of attachment under this title that the value of the defendant’s interest in the property described in the plaintiff’s application clearly exceeds the amount necessary to satisfy the amount to be secured by the attachment, the court may direct the order of levy on the property described in the writ or restrict the amount of the property to be levied upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Actions in Which Attachment Authorized [483.010. - 483.020.]

483.010.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, an attachment may be issued only in an action on a claim or claims for money, each of which is based upon a contract, express or implied, where the total amount of the claim or claims is a fixed or readily ascertainable amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500) exclusive of costs, interest, and attorney’s fees.

(b) An attachment may not be issued on a claim which is secured by any interest in real property arising from
 agreement, statute, or other rule of law (including any mortgage or deed of trust of realty and any statutory, common law, or equitable lien on real property, but excluding any security interest in fixtures subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code). However, an attachment may be issued where the claim was originally so secured but, without any act of the plaintiff or the person to whom the security was given, the security has become valueless or has decreased in value to less than the amount then owing on the claim, in which event the amount to be secured by the attachment shall not exceed the lesser of the amount of the decrease or the difference between the value of the security and the amount then owing on the claim.

(c) If the action is against a defendant who is a natural person, an attachment may be issued only on a claim which arises out of the conduct by the defendant of a trade, business, or
 profession. An attachment may not be issued on a claim against a defendant who is a natural person if the claim is based on the sale or lease of property, a license to use property, the furnishing of services, or the loan of money where the property sold or leased, or licensed for use, the services furnished, or the money loaned was used by the defendant primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(d) An attachment may be issued pursuant to this section whether or not other forms of relief are demanded.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 591, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

483.012.

Subject to the restrictions of Sections 580b and 580d, in an action to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on real property or an estate for years therein, pursuit of any remedy provided by this title shall not constitute an action for the recovery of a debt for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 726 or a failure to comply with any other statutory or judicial requirement to proceed first against security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

483.013.

Notwithstanding Section 483.010, federal disability benefits awarded to veterans for service-connected disabilities pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 38 of the United States Code shall be exempt from the claim of creditors, and shall not be liable to attachment, levy, or seizure by or under any legal or equitable process whatsoever, as provided by federal law. This section does not apply to that portion of service-connected disability benefits that are subject to child and spousal
 support enforcement under Section 659(h)(1)(A)(ii)(V) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

483.015.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b) and to Section 483.020, the amount to be secured by an attachment is the sum of the following:

(1) The amount of the defendant’s indebtedness claimed by the plaintiff.

(2) Any additional amount included by the court under Section 482.110.

(b) The amount described in subdivision (a) shall be reduced by the sum of the
 following:

(1) The amount of any money judgment in favor of the defendant and against the plaintiff that remains unsatisfied and is enforceable.

(2) The amount of any indebtedness of the plaintiff that the defendant has claimed in a cross-complaint filed in the action if the defendant’s claim is one upon which an attachment could be issued.

(3) The amount of any claim of the defendant asserted as a defense in the answer pursuant to Section 431.70 if the defendant’s claim is one upon which an attachment could be issued had an action been brought on the claim when it was not barred by the statute of limitations.

(4) The value of any security interest in the property of the defendant held by the plaintiff to secure the defendant’s indebtedness claimed by
 the plaintiff, together with the amount by which the value of the security interest has decreased due to the act of the plaintiff or a prior holder of the security interest.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 591, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

483.020.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (d) and (e), the amount to be secured by the attachment in an unlawful detainer proceeding is the sum of the following:

(1) The amount of the rent due and unpaid as of the date of filing the complaint in the unlawful detainer proceeding.

(2) Any additional amount included by the court under subdivision (c).

(3) Any
 additional amount included by the court under Section 482.110.

(b) In an unlawful detainer proceeding, the plaintiff’s application for a right to attach order and a writ of attachment pursuant to this title may include (in addition to the rent due and unpaid as of the date of the filing of the complaint and any additional estimated amount authorized by Section 482.110) an amount equal to the rent for the period from the date the complaint is filed until the estimated date of judgment or such earlier estimated date as possession has been or is likely to be delivered to the plaintiff, such amount to be computed at the rate provided in the lease.

(c) The amount to be secured by the attachment in the unlawful detainer proceeding may, in the discretion of the court, include an additional amount equal to the amount of rent for the period from the date the complaint is filed until the
 estimated date of judgment or such earlier estimated date as possession has been or is likely to be delivered to the plaintiff, such amount to be computed at the rate provided in the lease.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the amount to be secured by the attachment as otherwise determined under this section shall be reduced by the amounts described in subdivision (b) of Section 483.015.

(e) Where the plaintiff has received a payment or holds a deposit to secure (1) the payment of rent and the performance of other obligations under the lease or (2) only the performance of other obligations under the lease, the amount of the payment or deposit shall not be subtracted in determining the amount to be secured by the attachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Noticed Hearing Procedure for Obtaining Writ of Attachment [484.010. - 484.530.]



  ARTICLE 1. Right to Attach Order; Issuance of Writ of Attachment [484.010. - 484.110.]

484.010.

Upon the filing of the complaint or at any time thereafter, the plaintiff may apply pursuant to this article for a right to attach order and a writ of attachment by filing an application for the order and writ with the court in which the action is brought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

484.020.

The application shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(a) A statement showing that the attachment is sought to secure the recovery on a claim upon which an attachment may be issued.

(b) A statement of the amount to be secured by the attachment.

(c) A statement that the attachment is not sought for a purpose other than the recovery on the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(d) A statement that the applicant has no information or belief that the claim is discharged in a proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy) or that the prosecution of the action is stayed in a proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy).

(e) A description of the property to be attached under the writ of attachment and a statement that the plaintiff is informed and believes that such property is subject to attachment. Where the defendant is a corporation, a reference to “all corporate property which is subject to attachment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Code of Civil Procedure Section 487.010” satisfies the requirements of this subdivision. Where the defendant is a partnership or other unincorporated association, a reference to “all property of the partnership or other unincorporated association which is subject to attachment pursuant to
subdivision (b) of Code of Civil Procedure Section 487.010” satisfies the requirements of this subdivision. Where the defendant is a natural person, the description of the property shall be reasonably adequate to permit the defendant to identify the specific property sought to be attached.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 30.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

484.030.

The application shall be supported by an affidavit showing that the plaintiff on the facts presented would be entitled to a judgment on the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

484.040.

No order or writ shall be issued under this article except after a hearing. At the times prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1005, the defendant shall be served with all of the following:

(a) A copy of the summons and complaint.

(b) A notice of application and hearing.

(c) A copy of the application and of any affidavit in support of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 693, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

484.050.

The notice of application and hearing shall inform the defendant of all of the following:

(a) A hearing will be held at a place and at a time, to be specified in the notice, on plaintiff’s application for a right to attach order and a writ of attachment.

(b) The order will be issued if the court finds that the plaintiff’s claim is probably valid and the other requirements for issuing the order are established. The hearing is not
for the purpose of determining whether the claim is actually valid. The determination of the actual validity of the claim will be made in subsequent proceedings in the action and will not be affected by the decisions at the hearing on the application for the order.

(c) The amount to be secured by the attachment is determined pursuant to Sections 482.110, 483.010, 483.015, and 483.020, which statutes shall be summarized in the notice.

(d) If the right to attach order is issued, a writ of attachment will be issued to attach the property described in the plaintiff’s application unless the court determines that such property is exempt from attachment or that its value clearly exceeds the amount necessary to satisfy the amount to be secured by the attachment. However, additional writs of attachment may be issued to attach other nonexempt property of the defendant on the basis of the
right to attach order.

(e) If the defendant desires to oppose the issuance of the order, the defendant shall file with the court and serve on the plaintiff a notice of opposition and supporting affidavit as required by Section 484.060 not later than five court days prior to the date set for hearing.

(f) If the defendant claims that the personal property described in the application, or a portion thereof, is exempt from attachment, the defendant shall include that claim in the notice of opposition filed and served pursuant to Section 484.060 or file and serve a separate claim of exemption with respect to the property as provided in Section 484.070. If the defendant does not do so, the claim of exemption will be barred in the absence of a showing of a change in circumstances occurring after the expiration of the time for claiming exemptions.

(g) The defendant may obtain a determination at the hearing whether real or personal property not described in the application or real property described in the application is exempt from attachment by including the claim in the notice of opposition filed and served pursuant to Section 484.060 or by filing and serving a separate claim of exemption with respect to the property as provided in Section 484.070, but the failure to so claim that the property is exempt from attachment will not preclude the defendant from making a claim of exemption with respect to the property at a later time.

(h) Either the defendant or the defendant’s attorney or both of them may be present at the hearing.

(i) The notice shall contain the following statement: “You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with the
plaintiff’s application. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may assist you before the time set for hearing.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

484.060.

(a) If the defendant desires to oppose the issuance of the right to attach order sought by plaintiff or objects to the amount sought to be secured by the attachment, the defendant shall file and serve upon the plaintiff no later than five court days prior to the date set for the hearing a notice of opposition. The notice shall state the grounds on which the defendant opposes the issuance of the order or objects to the amount sought to be secured by the attachment and shall be accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised. If the defendant fails to
file a notice of opposition within the time prescribed, the defendant shall not be permitted to oppose the issuance of the order.

(b) If a defendant filing a notice of opposition desires to make any claim of exemption as provided in Section 484.070, the defendant may include that claim in the notice of opposition filed pursuant to this section.

(c) The plaintiff may file and serve upon the opposing party a reply two court days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1491, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

484.070.

(a) If the defendant claims that the personal property described in the plaintiff’s application, or a portion of such property, is exempt from attachment, the defendant shall claim the exemption as provided in this section. If the defendant fails to make the claim or makes the claim but fails to prove that the personal property is exempt, the defendant may not later claim the exemption except as provided in Section 482.100.

(b) If the defendant desires to claim at the
hearing that real or personal property not described in the plaintiff’s application or real property described in the plaintiff’s application is exempt from attachment, in whole or in part, the defendant shall claim the exemption as provided in this section. Failure to make the claim does not preclude the defendant from later claiming the exemption. If the claim is made as provided in this section but the defendant fails to prove that the property is exempt from attachment, the defendant may not later claim that the property, or a portion thereof, is exempt except as provided in Section 482.100.

(c) The claim of exemption shall:

(1) Describe the property claimed to be exempt.

(2) Specify the statute section supporting the claim.

(d) The claim of
exemption shall be accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised by the claim and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised.

(e) The claim of exemption, together with any supporting affidavit and points and authorities, shall be filed and served on the plaintiff not less than five court days before the date set for the hearing.

(f) If the plaintiff desires to oppose the claim of exemption, the plaintiff shall file and serve on the defendant, not less than two days before the date set for the hearing, a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption, accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised. If the plaintiff does not file and serve a notice of opposition as provided in this subdivision, no writ of attachment shall be issued as to the property claimed to be
exempt. If all of the property described in the plaintiff’s application is claimed to be exempt and the plaintiff does not file and serve a notice of opposition as provided in this subdivision, no hearing shall be held and no right to attach order or writ of attachment shall be issued and any temporary protective order issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 486.010) immediately expires.

(g) If the plaintiff files and serves a notice of opposition to the claim as provided in this section, the defendant has the burden of proving that the property is exempt from attachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 932, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

484.080.

(a) At the time set for the hearing, the plaintiff shall be ready to proceed. If the plaintiff is not ready, or if he has failed to comply with Section 484.040, the court may either deny the application for the order or, for good cause shown, grant the plaintiff a continuance for a reasonable period. If such a continuance is granted, the effective period of any protective order issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 486.010) may be extended by the court for a period ending not more than 10 days after the new hearing date if the plaintiff shows a continuing need for such protective order.

(b) The court may, in its discretion and for good cause shown, grant the defendant a continuance for a reasonable period to enable him to oppose the issuance of the right to attach order. If such a continuance is granted, the court shall extend the effective period of any protective order issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 486.010) for a period ending not more than 10 days after the new hearing date unless the defendant shows pursuant to Section 486.100 that the protective order should be modified or vacated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

484.090.

(a) At the hearing, the court shall consider the showing made by the parties appearing and shall issue a right to attach order, which shall state the amount to be secured by the attachment determined by the court in accordance with Section 483.015 or 483.020, if it finds all of the following:

(1) The claim upon which the attachment is based is one upon which an attachment may be issued.

(2) The plaintiff has
established the probable validity of the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(3) The attachment is not sought for a purpose other than the recovery on the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(4) The amount to be secured by the attachment is greater than zero.

(b) If, in addition to the findings required by subdivision (a), the court finds that the defendant has failed to prove that all the property sought to be attached is exempt from attachment, it shall order a writ of attachment to be issued upon the filing of an undertaking as provided by Sections 489.210 and 489.220.

(c) If the court determines that property of the defendant is exempt from attachment, in whole or in part, the right to attach order shall describe the exempt property and
prohibit attachment of the property.

(d) The court’s determinations shall be made upon the basis of the pleadings and other papers in the record; but, upon good cause shown, the court may receive and consider at the hearing additional evidence, oral or documentary, and additional points and authorities, or it may continue the hearing for the production of the additional evidence or points and authorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

484.100.

The court’s determinations under this chapter shall have no effect on the determination of any issues in the action other than issues relevant to proceedings under this chapter nor shall they affect the rights of the plaintiff or defendant in any other action arising out of the same claim of the plaintiff or defendant. The court’s determinations under this chapter shall not be given in evidence nor referred to at the trial of any such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 34.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

484.110.

(a) Neither the failure of the defendant to oppose the issuance of a right to attach order under this chapter nor the defendant’s failure to rebut any evidence produced by the plaintiff in connection with proceedings under this chapter shall constitute a waiver of any defense to the plaintiff’s claim in the action or any other action or have any effect on the right of the defendant to produce or exclude evidence at the trial of any such action.

(b) Neither the failure of the plaintiff to oppose the issuance of an order reducing the amount to be secured by the
attachment under this chapter nor the plaintiff’s failure to rebut any evidence produced by the defendant in connection with proceedings under this chapter shall constitute a waiver of any defense to the defendant’s claim in the action or any other action or have any effect on the right of the plaintiff to produce or exclude evidence at the trial of any such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 35.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Noticed Hearing Procedure for Obtaining Additional Writs [484.310. - 484.370.]

484.310.

At any time after a right to attach order has been issued under Article 1 (commencing with Section 484.010) or after the court has found pursuant to Section 485.240 that the plaintiff is entitled to a right to attach order, the plaintiff may apply for a writ of attachment under this article by filing an application with the court in which the action is brought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

484.320.

The application shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(a) A statement that the plaintiff has been issued a right to attach order under Article 1 (commencing with Section 484.010) or that the court has found pursuant to Section 485.240 that the plaintiff is entitled to a right to attach order.

(b) A statement of the amount to be secured by the attachment.

(c) A description of the property to be attached under the writ of
attachment and a statement that the plaintiff is informed and believes that the property is subject to attachment. The description shall satisfy the requirements of Section 484.020.

(d) A statement that the applicant has no information or belief that the claim is discharged in a proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy) or that the prosecution of the action is stayed in a proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 36.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

484.330.

No writ of attachment shall be issued under this article except after a hearing. At least 15 days prior to the hearing, the defendant shall be served with both of the following:

(a) A notice of application and hearing. 

(b) A copy of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1090, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

484.340.

The notice of application and hearing shall inform the defendant of all of the following:

(a) The plaintiff has applied for a writ of attachment to attach the property described in the application.

(b) A hearing will be held at a place and at a time, to be specified in the notice, to determine whether the plaintiff is entitled to the writ.

(c) A writ of attachment will be issued to attach the property described in the plaintiff’s application unless the
court determines that the property is exempt from attachment or that its value clearly exceeds the amount necessary to satisfy the amount to be secured by the attachment.

(d) If the defendant claims that the property described in the application, or a portion thereof, is exempt from attachment, the defendant may file with the court and serve on the plaintiff a claim of exemption with respect to the property as provided in Section 484.350 not later than five days prior to the date set for hearing. If the defendant fails to make such a claim with respect to personal property, the defendant may not later claim the exemption in the absence of a showing of a change in circumstances occurring after the expiration of the time for claiming exemptions.

(e) Either the defendant or the defendant’s attorney or both of them may be present at the hearing.

(f) The notice shall contain the following statement: “You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with the plaintiff’s application. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may assist you before the time set for hearing.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 37.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

484.350.

(a) If the defendant claims that the property described in the plaintiff’s application, or a portion of such property, is exempt from attachment, the defendant may claim the exemption as provided in this section. If the defendant fails to make a claim with respect to personal property, or makes a claim with respect to real or personal property but fails to prove that the property is exempt, the defendant may not later claim the exemption except as provided in Section 482.100.

(b) The claim of exemption shall:

(1) Describe the property claimed to be exempt.

(2) Specify the statute section supporting the claim.

(c) The claim of exemption shall be accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised by the claim and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised.

(d) The claim of exemption, together with any supporting affidavit and points and authorities, shall be filed and served on the plaintiff not less than five court days before the date set for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 932, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

484.360.

(a) If the defendant files and serves a claim of exemption and the plaintiff desires to oppose the claim, he shall file and serve on the defendant, not less than two days before the date set for the hearing, a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption, accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised.

(b) If the defendant files and serves a claim of exemption and supporting affidavit as provided in Section 484.350 and the plaintiff does not file and serve a notice of opposition as provided in this
section, no writ of attachment shall be issued as to the property claimed to be exempt. If all of the property described in the plaintiff’s application is claimed to be exempt and the plaintiff does not file and serve a notice of opposition as provided in this section, no hearing shall be held and no writ of attachment shall be issued.

(c) If the plaintiff files and serves a notice of opposition to the claim as provided in this section, the defendant has the burden of proving that the property is exempt from attachment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

484.370.

The hearing shall be conducted in the manner prescribed in Section 484.090 and the court shall order a writ of attachment to be issued upon the filing of an undertaking as provided by Sections 489.210 and 489.220, if it finds both of the following:

(a) A right to attach order has been issued in the action pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 484.010) or the court has found pursuant to Section 485.240 that the plaintiff is entitled to a right to attach order.

(b) The defendant has failed to prove that the property sought to be
attached, or the portion thereof to be described in the writ, is exempt from attachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Ex Parte Procedure for Obtaining Additional Writs [484.510. - 484.530.]

484.510.

(a) At any time after a right to attach order has been issued under Article 1 (commencing with Section 484.010) or after the court has found pursuant to Section 485.240 that the plaintiff is entitled to a right to attach order, the plaintiff may apply for a writ of attachment under this article by filing an application which meets the requirements of Section 484.320 with the court in which the action is brought.

(b) The application shall be accompanied by an affidavit showing that the property sought to be attached is not exempt from attachment. Such affidavit may be based on the
affiant’s information and belief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

484.520.

The court shall examine the application and supporting affidavit and shall order a writ of attachment to be issued upon the filing of an undertaking as provided by Sections 489.210 and 489.220, if it finds both of the following:

(a) A right to attach order has been issued in the action pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 484.010) or the court has found pursuant to Section 485.240 that the plaintiff is entitled to a right to attach order.

(b) The affidavit accompanying the application shows that the property sought to be attached,
or the portion thereof to be described in the writ, is not exempt from attachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------

484.530.

(a) The defendant may claim an exemption as to real or personal property levied upon pursuant to a writ issued under this article by following the procedure set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9, except that the defendant shall claim the exemption as to personal property not later than 30 days after the levying officer serves the defendant with the notice of attachment describing such property. For this purpose, references in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 to the “judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the
defendant, and references to the “judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.

(b) The defendant may claim the exemption provided by subdivision (b) of Section 487.020 within the time provided by subdivision (a) of this section either (1) by following the procedure set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703. 510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 or (2) by following the procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 482.100 except that the requirement of showing changed circumstances under subdivision (a) of Section 482.100 does not apply.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a claim of exemption shall be denied if the claim has been denied earlier in the action and there is no change in circumstances affecting the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 39.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Ex Parte Hearing Procedure for Obtaining Writ of Attachment [485.010. - 485.610.]



  ARTICLE 1. Great or Irreparable Injury Requirement [485.010. - 485.010.]

485.010.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, no right to attach order or writ of attachment may be issued pursuant to this chapter unless it appears from facts shown by affidavit that great or irreparable injury would result to the plaintiff if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

(b) The requirement of subdivision (a) is satisfied if any of the following are shown:

(1) Under the circumstances of the case, it may be inferred that there is a danger that the
property sought to be attached would be concealed, substantially impaired in value, or otherwise made unavailable to levy if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

(2) Under the circumstances of the case, it may be inferred that the defendant has failed to pay the debt underlying the requested attachment and the defendant is insolvent in the sense that the defendant is generally not paying his or her debts as those debts become due, unless the debts are subject to a bona fide dispute. Plaintiff’s affidavit filed in support of the ex parte attachment shall state, in addition to the requirements of Section 485.530, the known undisputed debts of the defendant, that the debts are not subject to bona fide dispute, and the basis for plaintiff’s determination that the defendant’s debts are undisputed.

(3) A bulk sales notice has been recorded and
published pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 6101) of the Commercial Code with respect to a bulk transfer by the defendant.

(4) An escrow has been opened pursuant to the provisions of Section 24074 of the Business and Professions Code with respect to the sale by the defendant of a liquor license.

(5) Any other circumstance showing that great or irreparable injury would result to the plaintiff if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.
